Rhode Island, session 2025, SB301.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13-8-13 of the General Laws in Chapter 13-8 entitled "Parole" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
13-8-13. Life prisoners and prisoners with lengthy sentences.
(a) In the case of a prisoner sentenced to imprisonment for life, a parole permit may be
issued at any time after the prisoner has served not less than ten (10) years’ imprisonment; provided
that:
(1) In the case of a prisoner serving a sentence or sentences of a length making him or her
ineligible for a permit in less than ten (10) years, pursuant to §§ 13-8-9 and 13-8-10, the permit
may be issued at any time after the prisoner has served not less than ten (10) years’ imprisonment;
(2) In the case of a prisoner sentenced to imprisonment for life for a first- or second-degree
murder committed after July 10, 1989, the permit may be issued only after the prisoner has served
not less than fifteen (15) years’ imprisonment;
(3) In the case of a prisoner sentenced to imprisonment for life for a first- or second-degree
murder committed after June 30, 1995, the permit may be issued only after the prisoner has served
not less than twenty (20) years’ imprisonment;
(4) In the case of a prisoner sentenced to imprisonment for life for a first- or second-degree
murder committed after July 1, 2015, the permit may be issued only after the prisoner has served
not less than twenty-five (25) years’ imprisonment; and
(5) In the case of a prisoner sentenced to imprisonment for life for a crime, other than first-

or second-degree murder, committed after July 1, 2015, the permit may be issued only after the
prisoner has served not less than twenty (20) years’ imprisonment.
(b) The permit shall be issued only by a unanimous vote of all the attending members of
the board; provided that not less than four (4) members are present, and whenever, after the issue
of the permit, the prisoner shall be pardoned, then the control of the board over the prisoner shall
cease and terminate.
(c)(1) In the case of a prisoner sentenced to imprisonment for life who is convicted of
escape or attempted escape from the lawful custody of the warden of the adult correctional
institutions, the permit may be issued only after the prisoner has served not less than twenty-five
(25) years’ imprisonment; provided, however, that as to a prisoner who has been sentenced to
imprisonment for life for a conviction of first- or second-degree murder, committed after July 1,
2015, and who is convicted thereafter of escape or attempted escape from the lawful custody of the
warden of the adult correctional institutions, the permit may be issued only after the prisoner has
served not less than thirty-five (35) years’ imprisonment; and
(2) For each subsequent conviction of escape or attempted escape, an additional five (5)
years shall be added to the time required to be served.
(d) In the case of a prisoner sentenced consecutively to more than one life term for crimes
occurring after May 7, 1981, the permit may be issued only after the prisoner has served not less
than ten (10) years consecutively on each life sentence; provided, in the case of a prisoner sentenced
consecutively to more than one life term for crimes occurring after June 30, 1995, the permit may
be issued only after the prisoner has served not less than fifteen (15) years consecutively on each
life sentence. In the case of a prisoner sentenced consecutively to more than one life term for crimes
occurring after July 1, 2015, the permit may be issued only after the prisoner has served not less
than twenty (20) years consecutively on each life sentence. In the case of a prisoner sentenced
consecutively to more than one life term for crimes, including first- or second-degree murder,
occurring after July 1, 2015, the permit may be issued only after the prisoner has served not less
than twenty-five (25) years consecutively on each life sentence.
(e) Any person sentenced for any offense committed prior to his or her twenty-second
birthday, other than a person serving life without parole, shall be eligible for parole review and a
parole permit may be issued after the person has served no fewer than twenty (20) years’
imprisonment unless the person is entitled to earlier parole eligibility pursuant to any other
provisions of law. This subsection shall be given prospective and retroactive effect for all offenses
occurring on or after January 1, 1991.
(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of the general or public laws to the contrary,
LC000657 - Page 2 of 4

including, but not limited to, §§ 13-8-9 and 13-8-10, but specifically excluding any sentence
received under chapter 19.2 of title 12, and unless a prisoner is entitled to earlier eligibility for
parole pursuant to any other provision of law, a prisoner sentenced as an adult for any offense or
offenses committed prior to the prisoner's eighteenth birthday, shall be eligible for parole review
and a parole permit may be issued after the prisoner has served no fewer than fifteen (15) years
imprisonment.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage and shall be given prospective and
retroactive effect to all offenses occurring on or after January 1, 1991.
========
LC000657
========
LC000657 - Page 3 of 4